California statutes. Education Code
(1) The county office of education has failed, or is unable, to implement the recommendations of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence pursuant to Section 52072.5.

(2) The inadequate
 performance of the county office of education, based upon an evaluation rubric adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5, is either so persistent or acute as to require intervention by the Superintendent.

(c) For county offices of education identified pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent may, with the approval of the state board, do one or more of the following:

(1) Make changes to a local control and accountability plan adopted by the county board of education.

(2) Develop and impose a budget revision, in conjunction with revisions to the local control and accountability plan, that the Superintendent determines would allow the county office of education to improve the outcomes for all pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 in regard to state and local priorities.

(3) Stay or rescind an action, if that action is not required by a local collective bargaining agreement, that would prevent the county office of education from improving outcomes for all pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 in regard to state or local priorities.

(4) Appoint an academic trustee to exercise the powers and authority specified in this section on the Superintendent’s behalf.

(d) The Superintendent shall notify the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools, in writing, of any action by the state board to direct the Superintendent to exercise any of the powers and authorities specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 77.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.

(a) (1) By September 1, 2018, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the department shall establish a process, administered by the department, to select, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, county offices of education to serve as geographic lead agencies to conduct the activities required pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) The department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the geographic lead agencies shall work collaboratively to advance the purpose of the statewide system of support specified in subdivision (b) of Section 52059.5.

(B) The department and the California Collaborative
 for Educational Excellence shall establish a formal process to ensure that the department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the geographic lead agencies communicate with each other regularly.

(C) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall establish a process for the department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the geographic lead agencies to engage with stakeholders to inform each entity’s work within the statewide system of support established by Section 52059.5.

(D) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall establish a formal process to coordinate the activities of the department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, geographic lead agencies established pursuant to
 this section, expert lead agencies established pursuant to Section 52073.1, and special education resource leads established pursuant to Section 52073.2 to provide coherent and effective support to local educational agencies. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in consultation with the department, shall facilitate this formal process.

(3) The process to select geographic lead agencies shall ensure that no fewer than six and no more than 10 geographic lead agencies are selected in a manner to ensure statewide coverage. Geographic lead agencies shall be selected for a term not to exceed five years.

(4) The process to select geographic lead agencies shall, at a minimum, specify that a county office of education applying to be a geographic lead agency demonstrate all of the following:

(A) Appropriate
 expertise with the state priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and subdivision (d) of Section 52066 and with federal programs, which may include a plan to partner or subcontract, as appropriate, with other county offices of education or other entities for that expertise.

(B) Ability to build the capacity of county offices of education within a defined geographic area to provide effective assistance and support to school districts under the state priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and federal programs.

(C) Demonstrated capacity to provide assistance to school districts on improving pupil performance and closing achievement gaps for pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052.

(D) Capacity and willingness to provide necessary assistance and support to other county
 offices of education.

(E) Ability to coordinate and calibrate assistance and support provided to local educational agencies within a defined geographic area and with other geographic lead agencies, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the department.

(F) Willingness to establish goals and be held accountable for improved performance across multiple measures within a defined geographic area.

(5) A county office of education may partner as a consortium with other local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, or nonprofit educational services providers to submit a proposal to serve as a geographic lead agency.

(b) (1) A geographic lead agency shall have all of the following responsibilities:

(A) Assist in building the capacity of county offices of education within the geographic lead agency’s defined geographic area to provide effective assistance and support to school districts under the state priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and federal programs.

(B) Coordinate and calibrate assistance and support provided to local educational agencies within its defined geographic area and with other geographic lead agencies, expert lead agencies identified pursuant to Section 52073.1, special education resource leads identified pursuant to Section 52073.2, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the department.

(C) Provide assistance and support if another county office of education within the geographic lead agency’s defined geographic area is unable to provide appropriate
 assistance and support to one or more school districts in that county office of education’s boundaries, or at the request of a school district or county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 52071.

(D) Identify existing resources, professional development activities, and other efforts currently available within its designated geographic area to assist school districts and county offices of education to improve outcomes under the state priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and subdivision (d) of Section 52066, and upon request, share information about these existing resources.

(E) Upon request by the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, develop new resources and activities that are designed to build capacity within school districts and county offices of education across the state under the state
 priorities identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and subdivision (d) of Section 52066 or other areas of identified need.

(F) Other duties as specified by the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence as part of the process to select geographic lead agencies.

(2) A geographic lead agency may enter into subcontracts with one or more local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, or nonprofit educational services providers to assist in fulfilling the responsibilities described in this subdivision.

(c) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in consultation with the department, shall assist the geographic lead agencies in fulfilling the responsibilities described in subdivision (b).

(d) (1) At the conclusion of the term for each selected geographic lead agency, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, may renew the selection of the existing geographic lead agency or reopen the selection of a geographic lead agency in a manner consistent with subdivision (a).

(2) Before renewing the selection of an existing geographic lead agency, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall determine that the geographic lead agency has been successful in doing both of the following:

(A) Meeting the goals established pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(B) Fulfilling the responsibilities described in subdivision
 (b), including, but not limited to, progress in building the capacity of county offices of education within the geographic lead agency’s defined geographic area as demonstrated by trends within the geographic lead agency’s defined geographic area in the number of school districts receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and the number of school districts that stopped receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 due to improved performance on the state and local indicators developed for the California School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(3) As part of the request for renewal, an existing geographic lead agency shall provide a description of efforts the geographic lead agency has made to fulfill the responsibilities described in subdivision (b).

(e) Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of four
 million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be appropriated annually to the department from the General Fund to be awarded to county offices of education serving as geographic lead agencies pursuant to this section.

(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount appropriated in subdivision (e) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 76.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.1.

(a) Subject to an appropriation included in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may establish a process, administered by the department, to select, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, an expert lead agency based on specific expertise in an area of need to conduct activities and build statewide capacity to address that area of need within the statewide system of support.

(b) The process for selecting an expert lead agency pursuant to this section shall ensure, at a minimum, that the expert lead agency demonstrate the ability to coordinate and calibrate assistance and support provided based on the specific expertise in an area of need
 with geographic lead agencies, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the department, and, as appropriate, that the expert lead agency demonstrates the ability to provide assistance on improving pupil performance and closing achievement gaps for pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 in the specific area of statewide need.

(c) In selecting an expert lead agency pursuant to this section, the department and California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may select a county office of education serving as a geographic lead agency pursuant to Section 52073 or another local educational agency.

(d) Selection of an expert lead agency pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the limitation on the number of geographic lead agencies specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 52073.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 75.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.2.

(a) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the department shall establish a process, administered by the department, to select, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board in consultation with the Department of Finance, special education local plan areas, county offices of education, or consortia of special education local plan areas and county offices of education to serve as special education resource leads to work with lead agencies selected pursuant to Sections 52073 and 52073.1, and other county offices of education, to improve pupil outcomes as part of the statewide system of support pursuant to this article.

(b) The process to select special education resource leads shall ensure that no more than 10 special education resource leads are selected to provide specific expertise on special education issues within the statewide system of support. At least three resource leads shall be selected in a manner to ensure
 statewide representation and focus directly on building local and regional capacity to support local educational agencies in achieving the goals, actions, and services identified in their local control and accountability plans. Special education resource leads shall be selected for a term not to exceed five years.

(c) Commencing with the grant cycle beginning July 1, 2023, both of the following shall occur:

 (1) At least one resource lead shall be selected to support the development and implementation of high-quality individualized education programs.

(2) At least one resource lead shall be selected to, in partnership with a family support organization, or coalition of family support organizations, that provides support to families of pupils with disabilities, provide capacity building, training, and technical assistance on family support for families of pupils with disabilities, and conflict prevention and alternate dispute resolution in special education.

(d) For purposes of this section, “family support organization that provides support to families of pupils with disabilities” includes, but is not limited to, a state or federally funded organization that provides support to families of pupils with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 86.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Without capacity in California’s public school system to conduct meaningful interestholder engagement, especially as it relates to the local control and accountability plan development process, pupils, families, and communities may not be able to hold school districts accountable for decisions that affect pupil outcomes.

(2) The statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5 should include expertise and resources to help school districts improve in their ability to engage interestholders meaningfully.

(3) Through an important investment made through
 the Budget Act of 2018, the statewide system of support has grown to include the Community Engagement Initiative, which was established for the purpose of all of the following:

(A) Building capacity in communities and school districts to have difficult conversations with each other and build trust, with a focus on improving outcomes for pupils.

(B) Identifying effective models of community engagement and metrics to evaluate those models.

(C) Developing effective peer-to-peer partnerships between school districts and county offices of education, utilizing the existing professional learning networks structure administered by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, to deepen community engagement using lessons learned from the work identified in subparagraph (A) and the models identified in subparagraph
 (B).

(D) Scaling up the work identified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) to improve community engagement statewide and incorporate practices that prove effective toward school district and county office of education continuous improvement efforts.

(4) Through the Community Engagement Initiative, local educational agencies have been able to create authentic partnerships among pupils, families, districts, and communities that nurture relationships, build trust, ensure cultural, racial, and linguistic equity, and lead to transformative pupil outcomes.

(5) While the initial investment in the Community Engagement Initiative was an important initial foray into building local educational agency engagement capacity, work remains to strengthen engagement statewide and further address the gaps in local capacity for
 meaningful community engagement.

(b) The Community Engagement Initiative Expansion, or the Expansion, is hereby established for all of the following purposes:

(1) Increasing and enhancing the emphasis on the engagement of pupils, families, and communities in all aspects of the Community Engagement Initiative.

(2) Expanding the use of the Community Engagement Initiative’s identified metrics to create a common definition and clear standards for meaningful engagement at the local and state levels.

(3) Developing an in-depth training series on meaningful pupil, family, and community engagement and engaging local educational agencies and schoolsite staff in those trainings to build the knowledge, skillsets, and commitment of key staff in improving pupil,
 family, and community engagement.

(4) Increasing the capacity of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) to scale up the initiative and improve alignment with the statewide system of support.

(c) (1) By May 1, 2023, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, with approval from the executive director of the state board, shall select an expert community engagement lead agency, consistent with Section 52073.1, to coadminister the Expansion with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(2) The lead agency selected for the Expansion shall demonstrate a willingness and capacity to do all of the following:

(A) Develop
 and disseminate expertise in community engagement.

(B) Work collaboratively with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and a diverse group of education interestholders.

(C) Communicate regularly with the department, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the lead agencies specified in Section 52073 through the formal process established pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 52073.

(D) Document the outcomes of the activities authorized by this section through the duration of the Expansion and, in partnership with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the Expansion participants, develop resources based on the experiences and conclusions of the Community Engagement Initiative’s participants and the Expansion’s
 participants from their specific contexts that are broadly applicable and actionable statewide.

(E) Play a leadership role in disseminating the information specified in subparagraph (D) throughout the statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5 and serving as a resource to local educational agencies and community interestholders in applying that information to their local context.

(d) (1) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall create a common definition and clear metrics for effective, equitable community engagement that draw upon the metrics developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018.

(2) The metrics shall mirror the original
 purpose of the Community Engagement Initiative, which is to engage underrepresented pupils, families, and communities, build trust and have authentic and productive conversations, and link engagement to efforts that improve student outcomes.

(e) (1) On or before December 1, 2023, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall develop an in-depth training series and resources on meaningful pupil, family, and community engagement.

(2) The developed training series and resources shall be able to accomplish, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Develop professional development through train-the-trainer models or online training modules that are scaffolded to support the continued professional development and deeper expertise
 of educators.

(B) Provide technical assistance to local educational agencies.

(C) Develop a network of educators, especially those selected to participate in previous community engagement professional learning networks pursuant to Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018, who can provide coaching and training to other local educational agencies.

(3) The developed training series and resources shall include content on areas, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) How to have conversations on complex issues such as race, language, disability, understanding community expertise, and sharing power.

(B) Engaging local educational agency and schoolsite staff in those
 trainings to build the knowledge, skillsets, and commitment of key staff in improving pupil, family, and community engagement.

(C) Focusing on and centering the voices of pupils, families, and communities in decisionmaking processes.

(D) Protocols for facilitating professional learning networks to help other communities and school districts improve and deepen their interactions, including the Community Engagement Initiative Protocol Toolkit, developed and tested by community engagement professional learning networks convened pursuant to Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018.

(E) Metrics for measuring increases in community engagement, including the metrics developed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(F) How to leverage the Community Engagement
 Initiative for transformational school investments and authentic pupil, family, community, and educator engagement, including, but not limited to, local control and accountability plans, expanded learning opportunity programs, and California Community School Partnership Act grants.

(4) The training series and resources shall be made publicly available, at no cost to local educational agencies statewide.

(5) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall periodically update the trainings and resources, as needed, based on the findings of future community engagement professional learning networks and other research.

(f) For the 2022–23 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year, inclusive, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall
 convene 30 community engagement professional learning networks. Each of these professional learning networks shall be similar in composition to the teams described in subdivision (d) of Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018. These teams shall be willing to do all of the following:

(1) Participate in the professional learning network for no less than two years.

(2) Engage in open dialogue on issues related to improving local pupil outcomes.

(3) (A) Partner with other communities and school districts on improving community engagement.

(B) A partnership pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include providing fiscal support to partnering organizations to support their capacity for meaningful collaboration and implementation of
 the Community Engagement Initiative.

(g) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, each of the professional learning networks created pursuant to subdivision (f) shall include as cofacilitators members of a team that participated in the initial community engagement professional learning networks established pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (g) of Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018.

(h) Beginning on July 1, 2024, the professional learning networks created pursuant to subdivision (f) may also include as cofacilitators members of a team that participated in the initial community engagement professional learning networks established pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018.

(i) Each of the professional learning networks established pursuant to subdivision (f) shall do both of the
 following:

(1) Deepen the community engagement of the school districts and communities participating in each professional learning network, including by engaging with the Community Engagement Protocol Toolkit developed by the community engagement professional learning networks established pursuant to Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018.

(2) Use the metrics developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 140 of Chapter 32 of the Statutes of 2018 to measure changes in community engagement in each of the participating communities and school districts.

(j) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall incorporate learning recovery work, as authorized by the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 32526, into the
 training and resources provided to local educational agencies.

(k) By June 30, 2027, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the lead agency selected pursuant to subdivision (c) shall submit a report to the executive director of the state board, the Superintendent, the executive director of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, each of the lead agencies identified pursuant to Section 52073, and the chairpersons of each of the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of best practices for improving community engagement identified by the professional learning networks established under the Community Engagement Initiative and the Expansion, and any changes in the understanding of best practices throughout the duration of the Expansion.

(2) Using the definition and metrics identified pursuant to subdivision (d), an analysis of the impact of the work done by each team through the professional learning networks on their home communities and school districts.

(3) Feedback to improve the community engagement professional learning network protocol and metrics, and additional activities or resources that would assist in continued development of capacity within local educational agencies and local communities for conducting meaningful interestholder engagement.

(l) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to expand and strengthen the Community Engagement Initiative
 pursuant to this section. The administrative agent of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, pursuant to policy and program direction from the governing board of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, shall develop the budget for the Community Engagement Initiative Expansion, subject to approval by the Department of Finance. Of the amount appropriated in this subdivision, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated to the administrative agent of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence for costs associated with administering this program. All funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2029.

(m) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (l) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as
 defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 77.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.4.

(a) (1) Contingent upon federal English Language Acquisition, Language Enhancement, and Academic Achievement Act (20 U.S.C. 6811 et seq.) funds appropriated in Item 6100-125-0890 of the Budget Act of 2025 for the support of regional English learner lead agencies not being available due to a reduction in California’s receipt of federal funds, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent to award to county offices of education serving as regional English learner lead agencies consistent with this section.

(2) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be annually appropriated each
 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Superintendent to award to county offices of education serving as regional English learner lead agencies consistent with this section.

(b) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the department shall allocate the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to the 11 county offices of education serving as regional county office of education English learner specialists, pursuant to Provision 2 of Item 6100-125-0890 of the Budget Act of 2024, to provide technical assistance to local educational agencies on state and federal programs, and recommendations for best practices, instructional strategies, and improvement in English language proficiency and state academic standards. The department shall assess the performance of the county offices of education in performing the duties specified according to the metrics approved by the executive director of the state board pursuant to Provision 2 of Item 6100-125-0890 of
 the Budget Act of 2023, to the extent practicable, and provide a final report to the Department of Finance and the executive director of the state board on the regional county offices of education’s performance on these metrics no later than December 30, 2026.

(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the department shall select, in consultation with and subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, county offices of education to serve as regional English learner lead agencies to conduct the activities required pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) The process to select regional English learner lead agencies shall ensure that no fewer than five and no more than seven regional English learner lead agencies are selected in a manner to ensure statewide coverage. Regional English learner lead agencies shall be selected for a term not to exceed four
 years.

(3) The process to select regional English learner lead agencies shall, at a minimum, specify that a county office of education applying to be a regional English learner lead agency demonstrate all of the following:

(A) Appropriate expertise of the California English Learner Roadmap State Board of Education Policy: Educational Programs and Services for English Learners (EL Roadmap Policy), adopted by the state board on July 12, 2017.

(B) Ability to build the capacity of county offices of education within a defined region to provide effective assistance and support to school districts and charter schools around high-quality, comprehensive English language development instruction.

(C) Demonstrated capacity to provide technical assistance and
 resources to school districts and charter schools that support the development, implementation, and evaluation of effective English learner instructional programs.

(D) Capacity and willingness to provide necessary assistance and support to other county offices of education.

(E) Ability to coordinate and calibrate assistance and support provided to local educational agencies within a defined region and with other regional English learner lead agencies, Literacy Lead Agencies, and the department.

(F) Willingness and ability to establish outcome measures and high-leverage strategies, monitor progress, and be held accountable for improved performance across multiple measures within a defined region.

(4) Priority consideration to serve as a regional English
 learner lead agency shall be given to a county office of education with experience providing technical assistance to local educational agencies on state and federal requirements related to English learners pursuant to Provision 2 of Item 6100-125-0890 of the Budget Act of 2024.

(d) A regional English learner lead agency shall have all of the following responsibilities:

(1) Assist in building the capacity of county offices of education within the regional English learner lead agency’s defined region to provide technical assistance to support the development, implementation, and evaluation of effective English learner instructional programs.

(2) Coordinate and calibrate assistance and support provided to local educational agencies within its defined region and with other regional English learner lead agencies,
 geographic lead agencies identified pursuant to Section 52073, expert lead agencies identified pursuant to Section 52073.1, special education resource leads identified pursuant to Section 52073.2, literacy leads in the Statewide Literacy Network pursuant to Section 90 of the act that added this section, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, and the department. This shall include coordinating and calibrating assistance provided to school districts and charter schools receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3, based on performance on the state and local indicators included in the California School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5 of English learners and long-term English learners as defined in Section 52052.

(3) Coordinate and collaborate with other regional English learner lead agencies to provide support around high-quality English language
 development instruction across regions.

(4) Identify existing resources, professional development activities, and other efforts currently available within its designated region to assist local educational agencies in building effective English language acquisition programs and share information about these existing resources.

(5) In alignment with Section 361, work to incorporate the EL Roadmap Policy meaningfully within the statewide system of support established pursuant to Section 52059.5.

(6) Upon request by the department, develop new resources and activities that are designed to build capacity within local educational agencies to support the outcomes of English learner pupils, including long-term English learners.

(7) Participate in the Statewide
 Literacy Network activities to convene literacy leads to support statewide implementation of evidence-based practices aligned to the English Language Arts/English Language Development Framework adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap, the Literacy Roadmap, and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(8) Other duties as specified by the department.

(e) The department shall assist the regional English learner lead agencies in fulfilling the responsibilities described in subdivision (d).

(f) (1) At the conclusion of the term for each selected regional English learner lead agency, the department, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, may renew the selection of the existing regional English learner lead
 agency or reopen the selection of a regional English learner lead agency in a manner consistent with subdivision (c).

(2) Before renewing the selection of an existing regional English learner lead agency, the department shall determine that the regional English learner lead agency has been successful in doing both of the following:

(A) Meeting the outcome measures established pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(B) Fulfilling the responsibilities described in subdivision (d), including, but not limited to, progress in supporting school districts and charter schools and building the capacity of county offices of education within the regional English learner lead agency’s defined region, as demonstrated by trends within the regional English learner lead agency’s defined region in the
 number of school districts and charter schools receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3, and the number of school districts and charter schools that stopped receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 due to improved performance on the state and local indicators developed for the California School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5 of English learners and long-term English learners as defined in Section 52052.

(3) As part of the request for renewal, an existing regional English learner lead agency shall provide a description of efforts the regional English learner lead agency has made to fulfill the responsibilities described in subdivision (d).

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which they are appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 50.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

52073.5.

(a) (1) By March 1, 2024, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the department shall select, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board and as a result of a competitive process, local educational agencies, or a consortium of local educational agencies, to serve as Equity Leads within the system of support to conduct the activities required pursuant to this section.

(2) The competitive process to select the Equity Leads shall ensure that no fewer than two Equity Leads and no more than four Equity Leads are selected in a manner that provides for statewide coverage. The Equity Leads shall be selected for a term not to exceed five years.

(3) Notwithstanding the deadline established pursuant to paragraph (1), if the competitive selection process administered pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) yields fewer than six applicants, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence and the department shall reestablish a new competitive process, subject to all other requirements of this subdivision, to solicit a larger pool of applicants.
